pt-BR: Nível de força de retenção do ímã para artesanato: Extrapesado; Extraleve; Pesado; Leve; Médio; Outros
de: Haltekraft des Bastelmagneten: Extra Heavy-Duty; Besonders geringe Haltekraft; Hohe Haltekraft; Geringe Haltekraft; Mittlere Haltekraft; Andere
ja: Craftマグネットの保持力レベル: 超強力; 超軽量用; 強力; 軽量用; 中量用; その他
zh-CN: 手工磁铁吸力强度: 超重型; 超轻型; 重型; 轻型; 中型; 其他
es: Nivel de fuerza de sujeción del imán para manualidades: Fuerza extra; Resistencia extraligera; Resistencia fuerte; Resistencia ligera; Resistencia media; Otro
da: Håndværksmagnetens holdekraft: Ekstra kraftig; Ekstra let; Kraftig; Let; Medium; Andet
fi: Askartelumagneetin pitovoimataso: Erittäin voimakas; Erittäin kevyeen käyttöön; Raskaaseen käyttöön; Kevyeen käyttöön; Keskiraskaaseen käyttöön; Muu
th: ระดับความแรงในการยึดเกาะของแม่เหล็กงานฝีมือ: สำหรับงานหนักพิเศษ; สำหรับงานเบาพิเศษ; สำหรับงานหนัก; สำหรับงานเบา; สำหรับงานทั่วไป; อื่นๆ
ko: 공예용 자석 고정력 수준: 초고강도; 초경량; 고강도; 경량; 중강도; 기타
en: Craft magnet holding strength level: Extra heavy-duty; Extra light-duty; Heavy-duty; Light-duty; Medium-duty; Other
it: livello di forza di tenuta del magnete Craft: Per uso extra intensivo; Per uso extra leggero; Per uso intensivo; Per uso leggero; Per uso medio; Altro
lt-LT: Rankdarbių magneto laikymo stiprumo lygis: Ypač stiprūs; Ypač silpni; Stiprūs; Silpni; Vidutinio stiprumo; Kita
nb: Holdestyrkenivå produkt: Ekstra kraftig; Ekstra lett; Kraftig; Lett; Middels kraftig; Annet
ro-RO: Nivelul de rezistență al magnetului pentru proiecte de artizanat: Regim ultra-intens; Rezistență extra-ușoară; Regim greu; Regim ușor; Regim mediu; Altele
hu: Kézműves mágnes tartóerőszintje: Extra nagy teherbírású; Extra kis teherbírású; Nagy teherbírású; Kis teherbírású; Közepes teherbírású; Egyéb
fr: Niveau de puissance de maintien de l’aimant créatif: Extra-résistant; Usage très léger; Usage intensif; Usage léger; Usage moyen; Autre
vi: Mức độ lực giữ của nam châm thủ công: Lực hút cực mạnh; Lực hút cực nhẹ; Lực hút mạnh; Lực hút nhẹ; Lực hút trung bình; Khác
pt-PT: Nível de força de retenção do íman Craft: Extraforte; Extraleve; Forte; Leve; Média; Outro
sv: Hållstyrka för Craft: Extra kraftig; Extra lätt; Kraftig; Lätt; Medium; Övrigt
sk-SK: Úroveň sily držania ozdobného magnetu: Extra silné; Veľmi nízka záťaž; Vysoká záťaž; Nízka záťaž; Stredná záťaž; Iné
tr: Hobi mıknatısı tutma gücü düzeyi: Ekstra ağır hizmet tipi; Ekstra hafif hizmet tipi; Ağır hizmet tipi; Hafif hizmet tipi; Orta hizmet tipi; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο ισχύος συγκράτησης μαγνήτη χειροτεχνίας: Εξαιρετικά βαρέως τύπου; Εξαιρετικά ελαφρού τύπου; Βαρέως τύπου; Ελαφρού τύπου; Μεσαίου τύπου; Άλλο
zh-TW: 手作磁鐵吸附強度等級: 特重載; 特輕載; 重載; 輕載; 中等載重; 其他
pl: Poziom siły trzymania magnesu rękodzielniczego: Bardzo silne; Bardzo słabe; Silne; Słabe; Średnio silne; Inne
cs: Úroveň přídržné síly řemeslného magnetu: Extra silné; Extra slabé; Silné; Slabé; Středně silné; Ostatní
nl: Knutselmagneet houdkracht: Extra zwaar; Extra licht; Zwaar; Licht; Middelzwaar; Overige
sl-SI: Stopnja zadrževalne moči magneta za ustvarjanje: Zelo visoka nosilnost; Zelo nizka nosilnost; Visoka nosilnost; Nizka nosilnost; Srednja nosilnost; Drugo
bg-BG: Ниво на сила на задържане на декоративен магнит: Изключително висока издръжливост; Изключително ниска издръжливост; Висока издръжливост; Ниска издръжливост; Средна издръжливост; Други
ru: Уровень удерживающей силы магнита для рукоделия: Сверхсильная фиксация; Сверхлегкая фиксация; Сильная фиксация; Легкая фиксация; Средняя фиксация; Другое
hr-HR: Razina čvrstoće držanja magneta za rukotvorine: Iznimno snažno; Iznimno slabo; Snažno; Za mala opterećenja; Za srednja opterećenja; Ostalo